Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.130

Educational records—Permanent file—Protection.

If any degree-granting institution discontinues its operation, the chief administrative officer of the institution shall file with the council the original or legible true copies of all educational records required by the council. If the council determines that any educational records are in danger of being made unavailable to the council, the council may seek a court order to protect and if necessary take possession of the records. The council shall cause to be maintained a permanent file of educational records coming into its possession.

[ 2012 c 229 s 552; 1986 c 136 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.